test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kadota_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kađota - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     kađota+V+Inf: kađota
     kađota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kattoon
     kađota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kattoot
     kađota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kattoo
     kađota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kattooma
     kađota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kattootta
     kađota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kađothaan
     kađota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: katosin
     kađota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: katosit
     kađota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: katos
     kađota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: katosimma
     kađota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: katositta
     kađota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kađothiin
     kađota+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kađonu
     kađota+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: kađottu
     kađota+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kađonheet
     kađota+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kattoova
     kađota+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kattoovat
     kađota+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kađottava
     kađota+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kađottavat
     
     kađota+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: kattoisin
     kađota+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: kattoisit
     kađota+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kattois
     kađota+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: kattoisimma
     kađota+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: kattoisitta
     kađota+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: kađottais
     kađota+V+Pass+Cond: kađottais
     
     kađota+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: kattoo
     kađota+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: kattookkaa
     
     kađota+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: kattoomassa
     kađota+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: kattoomasta
     kađota+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: kattoomhaan
     kađota+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: kattoomalla
     kađota+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: kattoomatta
